North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75. Monopolies, Trusts and Consumer Protection.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 75-1.
Combinations in restraint of trade illegal.

Every contract, combination in the form of trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce in the State of North Carolina is hereby declared to be illegal. Every person or corporation who shall make any such contract expressly or shall knowingly be a party thereto by implication, or who shall engage in any such combination or conspiracy shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 1; C.S., s. 2559; 1981, c. 764, s. 2.

Cross References.

For provision declaring certain agreements between employers and labor organizations to be illegal combinations in restraint of trade, see

G.S. 95-79

.

As to illegal combinations in restraint of trade by contractors, subcontractors, and suppliers in dealing with governmental agencies, see

G.S. 133-23

through 133-33.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the law of unfair competition in North Carolina, see 46 N.C.L. Rev. 856 (1968).

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For note on price discrimination in North Carolina, see 53 N.C.L. Rev. 135 (1974).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

For article discussing North Carolina antitrust and consumer protection law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 207 (1982).

For survey of 1981 commercial law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1238 (1982).

For article discussing unfair methods of competition, deceptive trade practices, and unfair trade practices, see 5 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1982).

For note, “The Need for Antitrust Legislation Tailored to the Specific Concerns of Bank-Nonbank Director Interlocks,” see 1982 Duke L.J. 938 (1982).

For survey of 1982 commercial law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1018 (1983).

For note, “Real Estate Finance—Subordination Causes: North Carolina Subordinates Substance to Form—MCB Ltd. v. McGowan,” see 23 Wake Forest L. Rev. 575 (1988).

For article, “Misrepresentation in North Carolina,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 323 (1992).

For article, “Non-UCC Statutory Provisions Affecting Warranty Disclaimers and Remedies in Sales of Goods,” see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1011 (1993).

For article, “The Learned Profession Exemption of the North Carolina Deceptive Trade Practices Act: The Wrong Bright Line?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (1993).

§ 75-1.1.
Methods of competition, acts and practices regulated; legislative policy.

Unfair methods of competition in or affecting commerce, and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce, are declared unlawful.

For purposes of this section, “commerce” includes all business activities, however denominated, but does not include professional services rendered by a member of a learned profession.

Nothing in this section shall apply to acts done by the publisher, owner, agent, or employee of a newspaper, periodical or radio or television station, or other advertising medium in the publication or dissemination of an advertisement, when the owner, agent or employee did not have knowledge of the false, misleading or deceptive character of the advertisement and when the newspaper, periodical or radio or television station, or other advertising medium did not have a direct financial interest in the sale or distribution of the advertised product or service.

Any party claiming to be exempt from the provisions of this section shall have the burden of proof with respect to such claim.

History.

1969, c. 833; 1977, c. 747, ss. 1, 2.

Cross References.

As to prohibition of falsely obtaining, selling or soliciting telephone records, see

G.S. 14-113.31

.

As to the crime of filing a false lien or encumbrance, see

G.S. 14-118.6

.

As to requirements for maintenance fees for gift cards, see

G.S. 66-67.5

.

As to the unfair trade practice of solicitation without disclosures, see G.S. 131C-21.1 and 131C-16.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For comment on retaliatory eviction in landlord-tenant relations, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 861 (1976).

For note discussing the role of the jury in applying deceptive trade practices legislation, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 963 (1976).

For comment, “Attacking the ‘Forfeiture as Liquidated Damages’ Clause in North Carolina Installment Land Sales Contracts as an Equitable Mortgage, Penalty and Unfair and Deceptive Trade Practice,” see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 370 (1976).

For note discussing this section, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 484 (1976).

For survey of 1976 case law on commercial law, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 943 (1977).

For comment discussing the effect of the 1977 amendment to this section, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 547 (1978).

For survey of 1977 law on trade regulation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 934 (1978).

For survey of 1978 commercial law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 919 (1979).

For article, “The Ombudsman, or Citizens’ Defender — The North Carolina Experience,” see 10 N.C. Cent. L.J. 227 (1979).

For survey of 1979 commercial law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1290 (1980).

For survey of 1980 commercial law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1017 (1981).

For an article on installment land contracts in North Carolina, see 3 Campbell L. Rev. 29 (1981).

For note on commercial reasonableness and the public sale in North Carolina, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 153 (1981).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

For article discussing North Carolina antitrust and consumer protection law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 207 (1982).

For comment on landlords’ eviction remedies in the light of Spinks v. Taylor,

303 N.C. 256

, 278 S.E.2d 501 (1981), and the 1981 “Act to Clarify Landlord Eviction Remedies in Residential Tenancies,” see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 885 (1982).

For survey of 1981 commercial law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1238 (1982).

For article discussing unfair methods of competition, deceptive trade practices, and unfair trade practices, see 5 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1982).

For article on lawyer advertising, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 503 (1982).

For note concerning intent under North Carolina’s Unfair or Deceptive Acts or Practices Statute, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 134 (1982).

For survey of 1982 commercial law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1018 (1983).

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

For article discussing pendent claims for damages in actions under the Federal Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act, see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 299 (1985).

For note on arbitration and punitive damages, in light of Rodgers Builders, Inc. v. McQueen, 76 N.C. App. 16, 331 S.E.2d 726 (1985), cert. denied,

315 N.C. 590

, 341 S.E.2d 29 (1986), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1145 (1986).

For note, “Bad Faith Refusal to Pay First-Party Insurance Claims: A Growing Recognition of Extra-Contract Damages,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1421 (1986).

For article, “Unfair and Deceptive Legislation: The Case for Finding North Carolina General Statutes Section 75-1.1 Unconstitutionally Vague as Applied to an Alleged Breach of a Commercial Contract,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 421 (1986).

For survey of North Carolina construction law, with particular reference to unfair or deceptive acts or practices, see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 633 (1986).

For article, “North Carolina’s Cautious Approach Toward the Imposition of Extracontract Liability on Insurers for Bad Faith,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 957 (1986).

For survey of 1987 law on unfair and deceptive trade practices, see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1169 (1987).

For article, “North Carolina Construction Law Survey II,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 481 (1987).

For note, “Consumer Protection—The Unfair Trade Practice Act and the Insurance Code: Does Per Se Necessarily Preempt?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 487 (1988).

As to article discussing deceptive trade practices, see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 1225 (1989).

For article concerning federal preemption in state unfair competition cases, “Refusing to Rock the Boat: The Sears/Compoco Preemption Doctrine Applied to Bonito Boats v. Thunder Craft,” see 25 Wake Forest L. Rev. 385 (1990).

For note, “Ellis v. Northern Star Co.: Libel in a Business Setting Subject to Mandatory Treble Damages Under North Carolina General Statutes Sections 75-1.1 and 75-16,” see 69 N.C.L. Rev. 1739 (1991).

For survey on consumer law, see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1959 (1992).

For article, “Drafting, Interpreting, and Enforcing Commercial and Shopping Center Leases,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 275 (1993).

For article, “The Learned Profession Exemption of the North Carolina Deceptive Trade Practices Act: The Wrong Bright Line?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (1993).

For article, “Unfair Trade Practices, Antitrust and Consumer Welfare in North Carolina,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 1927 (2002).

For article, “Silence Is Golden: The Case for Mandatory Disclosure of Coastal Hazards and Land-Use Restrictions by Residential Sellers in North Carolina,” 25 N.C. Cent. L.J. 96 (2002).

For comment, “The Sword of North Carolina’s ‘Unfair and Deceptive Trade Practices Act’: Combating North Carolina Businesses Who Undercut Competition by Hiring Illegal Immigrants,” see 29 Campbell L. Rev. 333 (2007).

For article, “Defining Unfairness in ‘Unfair Trade Practices,”’ see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 2033 (2012).

§ 75-2.
Any restraint in violation of common law included.

Any act, contract, combination in the form of trust, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce which violates the principles of the common law is hereby declared to be in violation of

G.S. 75-1

.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 2; C.S., s. 2560.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For survey of 1981 commercial law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1238 (1982).

For article discussing unfair methods of competition, deceptive trade practices, and unfair trade practices, see 5 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1982).

§ 75-2.1.
Monopolizing and attempting to monopolize prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to monopolize, or attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person or persons to monopolize, any part of trade or commerce in the State of North Carolina.

History.

1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 550, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on “requirements contracts” as violations of this section, see 29 N.C.L. Rev. 316 (1951).

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For note on price discrimination in North Carolina, see 53 N.C.L. Rev. 135 (1974).

For article discussing North Carolina antitrust and consumer protection law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 207 (1982).

§ 75-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1961, c. 1153.

§ 75-4.
Contracts to be in writing.

No contract or agreement hereafter made, limiting the rights of any person to do business anywhere in the State of North Carolina shall be enforceable unless such agreement is in writing duly signed by the party who agrees not to enter into any such business within such territory: Provided, nothing herein shall be construed to legalize any contract or agreement not to enter into business in the State of North Carolina, or at any point in the State of North Carolina, which contract is now illegal, or which contract is made illegal by any other section of this Chapter.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 4; C.S., s. 2562.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For article, “The Regulation of Contractual Change: A Guide to No Oral Modification Clauses for North Carolina Lawyers,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2239 (2003).

§§ 75-5 through 75-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 550, s. 2.

§ 75-8.
Continuous violations separate offenses.

Where the things prohibited in this Chapter are continuous, then in such event, after the first violation of any of the provisions hereof, each week that the violation of such provision shall continue shall be a separate offense.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 7; C.S., s. 2566.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

§ 75-9.
Duty of Attorney General to investigate.

The Attorney General of the State of North Carolina shall have power, and it shall be his duty, to investigate, from time to time, the affairs of all corporations or persons doing business in this State, which are or may be embraced within the meaning of the statutes of this State defining and denouncing trusts and combinations against trade and commerce, or which he shall be of opinion are so embraced, and all other corporations or persons in North Carolina doing business in violation of law; and all other corporations of every character engaged in this State in the business of transporting property or passengers, or transmitting messages, and all other public service corporations of any kind or nature whatever which are doing business in the State for hire. Such investigation shall be with a view of ascertaining whether the law or any rule of the Utilities Commission or Commission of Banks [Commissioner of Banks] is being or has been violated by any such corporation, officers or agents or employees thereof, and if so, in what respect, with the purpose of acquiring such information as may be necessary to enable him to prosecute any such corporation, its agents, officers and employees for crime, or prosecute civil actions against them if he discovers they are liable and should be prosecuted.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 8; C.S., s. 2567; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; 1941, c. 97, s. 5; 1969, c. 833.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For comment on the Landlord Eviction Remedies Act in light of Spinks v. Taylor,

303 N.C. 256

, 278 S.E.2d 501 (1981), see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 25 (1982).

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 75-10.
Power to compel examination.

In performing the duty required in

G.S. 75-9

, the Attorney General shall have power, at any and all times, to require the officers, agents or employees of any such corporation or business, and all other persons having knowledge with respect to the matters and affairs of such corporations or businesses, to submit themselves to examination by him, and produce for his inspection any of the books and papers of any such corporations or businesses, or which are in any way connected with the business thereof; and the Attorney General is hereby given the right to administer oath to any person whom he may desire to examine. He shall also, if it may become necessary, have a right to apply to any justice or judge of the appellate or superior court divisions, after five days’ notice of such application, for an order on any such person or corporation he may desire to examine to appear and subject himself or itself to such examination, and disobedience of such order shall constitute contempt, and shall be punishable as in other cases of disobedience of a proper order of such judge.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 9; C.S., s. 2568; 1969, c. 44, s. 56; c. 833.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

§ 75-11.
Person examined exempt from prosecution.

No natural person examined, as provided in

G.S. 75-10

, shall be subject to indictment, criminal prosecution, criminal punishment or criminal penalty by reason of or on account of anything disclosed by him upon examination, and full immunity from criminal prosecution and criminal punishment by reason of or on account of anything so disclosed is hereby extended to all natural persons so examined. The immunity herein granted shall not apply to civil actions instituted pursuant to this Chapter.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 9; C.S., s. 2569; 1969, c. 833.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-12.
Refusal to furnish information; false swearing.

Any corporation or person unlawfully refusing or willfully neglecting to furnish the information required by this Chapter, when it is demanded as herein provided, shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor and only fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000): Provided, that if any corporation or person shall in writing notify the Attorney General that it objects to the time or place designated by him for the examination or inspection provided for in this Chapter, it shall be his duty to apply to a justice or judge of the appellate or superior court division, who shall fix an appropriate time and place for such examination or inspection, and such corporation or person shall, in such event, be guilty under this section only in the event of its failure, refusal or neglect to appear at the time and place so fixed by the judge and furnish the information required by this Chapter. False swearing by any person examined under the provisions of this Chapter is a Class I felony.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 10; C.S., s. 2570; 1969, c. 44, s. 57; c. 833; 1993, c. 539, ss. 560, 1284; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-13.
Criminal prosecution; district attorneys to assist; expenses.

The Attorney General in carrying out the provisions of this Chapter shall have a right to send bills of indictment before any grand jury in any county in which it is alleged this Chapter has been violated or in any adjoining county, and may take charge of and prosecute all cases coming within the purview of this Chapter, and shall have the power to call to his assistance in the performance of any of these duties of his office which he may assign to them any of the district attorneys in the State, who shall, upon being required to do so by the Attorney General, send bills of indictment and assist him in the performance of the duties of his office.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 13; C.S., s. 2571; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-14.
Action to obtain mandatory order.

If it shall become necessary to do so, the Attorney General may prosecute civil actions in the name of the State on relation of the Attorney General to obtain a mandatory order, including (but not limited to) permanent or temporary injunctions and temporary restraining orders, to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, and the venue shall be in any county as selected by the Attorney General.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 11; C.S., s. 2572; 1969, c. 833.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For survey of 1980 commercial law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1017 (1981).

§ 75-15.
Actions prosecuted by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General, upon his ascertaining that the laws have been violated by any trust or public service corporation, so as to render it liable to prosecution in a civil action, to prosecute such action in the name of the State, or any officer or department thereof, as provided by law, or in the name of the State on relation of the Attorney General, and to prosecute all officers or agents or employees of such corporations, whenever in his opinion the interests of the public require it.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 12; C.S., s. 2573.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-15.1.
Restoration of property and cancellation of contract.

In any suit instituted by the Attorney General to enjoin a practice alleged to violate

G.S. 75-1.1

, the presiding judge may, upon a final determination of the cause, order the restoration of any moneys or property and the cancellation of any contract obtained by any defendant as a result of such violation.

History.

1973, c. 614, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

§ 75-15.2.
Civil penalty.

In any suit instituted by the Attorney General, in which the defendant is found to have violated

G.S. 75-1.1

and the acts or practices which constituted the violation were, when committed, knowingly violative of a statute, the court may, in its discretion, impose a civil penalty against the defendant of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. In any action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to this Chapter in which it is shown that an action or practice when committed was specifically prohibited by a court order, the Court may, in its discretion, impose a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Civil penalties may be imposed in a new action or by motion in an earlier action, whether or not such earlier action has been concluded. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of the harm caused by the conduct constituting a violation, the nature and persistence of such conduct, the length of time over which the conduct occurred, the assets, liabilities, and net worth of the person, whether corporate or individual, and any corrective action taken by the defendant. The clear proceeds of penalties so assessed shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1977, c. 747, s. 3; 1983, c. 721, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 99.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this section, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 547 (1978).

For survey of 1980 commercial law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1017 (1981).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

§ 75-16.
Civil action by person injured; treble damages.

If any person shall be injured or the business of any person, firm or corporation shall be broken up, destroyed or injured by reason of any act or thing done by any other person, firm or corporation in violation of the provisions of this Chapter, such person, firm or corporation so injured shall have a right of action on account of such injury done, and if damages are assessed in such case judgment shall be rendered in favor of the plaintiff and against the defendant for treble the amount fixed by the verdict.

History.

1913, c. 41, s. 14; C.S., s. 2574; 1969, c. 833; 1977, c. 707.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Consumer Protection and Unfair Competition — The 1969 Legislation,” see
48 N.C.L. Rev. 896 (1970).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For comment, “Attacking the ‘Forfeiture as Liquidated Damages’ Clause in North Carolina Installment Land Sales Contracts as an Equitable Mortgage, Penalty and Unfair and Deceptive Trade Practice,” see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 370 (1976).

For survey of 1980 commercial law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1017 (1981).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

For article discussing unfair methods of competition, deceptive trade practices, and unfair trade practices, see 5 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1982).

For note suggesting that intent is not required to award treble damages for a violation of North Carolina’s Unfair or Deceptive Acts or Practices Statute, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 134 (1982).

For comment on the Landlord Eviction Remedies Act in light of Spinks v. Taylor,

303 N.C. 256

, 278 S.E.2d 501 (1981), see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 25 (1982).

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

For article discussing pendent claims for damages in actions under the Federal Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act, see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 299 (1985).

For survey of North Carolina construction law, with particular reference to unfair or deceptive acts or practices, see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 633 (1986).

For survey of 1987 law on unfair and deceptive trade practices, see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1169 (1987).

For note, “Consumer Protection—The Unfair Trade Practice Act and the Insurance Code: Does Per Se Necessarily Preempt?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 487 (1988).

For note, “Ellis v. Northern Star Co.: Libel in a Business Setting Subject to Mandatory Treble Damages Under North Carolina General Statutes Sections 75-1.1 and 75-16,” see 69 N.C.L. Rev. 1739 (1991).

For survey on consumer law, see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1959 (1992).

For article, “The Learned Profession Exemption of the North Carolina Deceptive Trade Practices Act: The Wrong Bright Line?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (1993).

For article, “North Carolina’s New Punitive Damages Statute: Who’s Being Punished, Anyway?,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 2174 (1996).

For article, “Unfair Trade Practices, Antitrust and Consumer Welfare in North Carolina,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 1927 (2002).

For article, “Defining Unfairness in ‘Unfair Trade Practices,”’ see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 2033 (2012).

For comment, “Bank Sales and Bake Sales: Section 75-1.1 and the HAJMM Legacy,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 163 (2018).

§ 75-16.1.
Attorney fee.

In any suit instituted by a person who alleges that the defendant violated

G.S. 75-1.1

, the presiding judge may, in his discretion, allow a reasonable attorney fee to the duly licensed attorney representing the prevailing party, such attorney fee to be taxed as a part of the court costs and payable by the losing party, upon a finding by the presiding judge that:

The party charged with the violation has willfully engaged in the act or practice, and there was an unwarranted refusal by such party to fully resolve the matter which constitutes the basis of such suit; or

The party instituting the action knew, or should have known, the action was frivolous and malicious.

History.

1973, c. 614, s. 1; 1983, c. 417, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

For comment, “Time Sharing: The North Carolina General Assembly’s Response to Ownership of Time Share Contracts,” see 15 N.C. Cent. L.J. 56 (1984).

For note, “Consumer Protection—The Unfair Trade Practice Act and the Insurance Code: Does Per Se Necessarily Preempt?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 487 (1988).

For article, “The Learned Profession Exemption of the North Carolina Deceptive Trade Practices Act: The Wrong Bright Line?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (1993).

For article, “Defining Unfairness in ‘Unfair Trade Practices,”’ see 90 N.C. L. Rev. 2033 (2012).

For comment, “Finality and Clarity Regarding Pending Claims for Attorney’s Fees: Duncan and the Superfluous 54(b) Certification,” see 36 Campbell L. Rev. 339 (2014).

For comment, “Bank Sales and Bake Sales: Section 75-1.1 and the HAJMM Legacy,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 163 (2018).

For article, “Defining North Carolina’s Public Records and Open Meetings Feeshifting Provisions in the Larger National Context,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 1725 (2018).

§ 75-16.2.
Limitation of actions.

Any civil action brought under this Chapter to enforce the provisions thereof shall be barred unless commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues.

When any civil or criminal proceeding shall be commenced by the Attorney General or by any of the district attorneys of the State to prevent, restrain or punish a violation of Chapter 75, the running of the period of limitation with respect to every private right of action arising under Chapter 75 and based in whole or in part on any matter complained of in said proceeding shall be suspended during the pendency thereof and for one year thereafter; provided that when the running of the period of limitation with respect to a cause of action arising under Chapter 75 shall be suspended hereunder, any action to enforce such cause of action shall be barred unless commenced either within the period of suspension or within four years after the cause of action accrued, whichever is later.

History.

1979, c. 169, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 commercial law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1290 (1980).

For comment on the Business Opportunity Sales Act of 1977, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 623 (1981).

For note, “Consumer Protection—The Unfair Trade Practice Act and the Insurance Code: Does Per Se Necessarily Preempt?,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 487 (1988).

For article, “The Learned Profession Exemption of the North Carolina Deceptive Trade Practices Act: The Wrong Bright Line?,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (1993).

§ 75-17.
Lender may not require borrower to deal with particular insurer.

No person, firm, or corporation engaged in lending money on the security of real or personal property, and no trustee, director, officer, agent, employee, affiliate, or associate, of any such person, firm, or corporation, shall either directly or indirectly require or impose as a condition precedent

To financing the purchase of such property, or

To lending money upon the security of a mortgage, deed of trust, or other security instrument, or

For the renewal or extension of any such loan, mortgage, or deed of trust, or

For the performance of any other act in connection therewith,

that such person, firm or corporation

For whom such purchase is to be financed, or

To whom the money is to be loaned, or

For whom such extension, renewal, or other act is to be granted,

negotiate, procure, or otherwise obtain any policy of insurance or renewal, or extension thereof, covering such property, or a security interest therein, by or through a particular insurance company, agent, broker, or other person so specified or otherwise designated in any manner by the lenders, or their agents or employees or affiliated or related companies.

History.

1969, c. 1032, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-18.
Lender may require nondiscriminatory approval of insurer.

Although the lender and other persons enumerated in

G.S. 75-17

may not specify or designate as a condition precedent a particular insurance company or agent, those persons, firms, or corporations engaged in lending money may approve the insurer selected by the borrower on a reasonable, nondiscriminatory basis, related to the solvency of the company and the type and provisions of policy coverage.

History.

1969, c. 1032, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-19.
Violators subject to fine and injunction.

The superior court, on complaint by any person that

G.S. 75-17

or

G.S. 75-18

is being violated, may issue an injunction against such violation and may fine all persons, firms, corporations, and officers, directors, trustees, agents, employees, or affiliates of such up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per person for such violation. In event of a disregard of such injunction or other court order, the superior court shall hold such parties in contempt and prescribe such further penalties as the court in its discretion shall so determine. The clear proceeds of fines provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1969, c. 1032, s. 3; 1998-215, s. 100.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

§ 75-20.
Unsolicited checks to secure loans.

No person, firm, or corporation engaged in lending money shall deliver to a person an unsolicited check made out to the recipient that upon cashing, obligates the recipient to repay the amount of the check plus interest and fees, unless all of the following requirements are satisfied:

In addition to any disclosures otherwise required by law, the solicitation for loans using a facsimile or negotiable check shall disclose both of the following on the face of the check:

In at least 10-point boldface type a statement in substantially the following form: “THIS IS A SOLICITATION FOR A LOAN. READ THE ATTACHED DISCLOSURES BEFORE SIGNING THIS AGREEMENT.”

In at least 6-point type a statement in substantially the following form: “By endorsing the back of this check, you accept our offer and agree to the terms of your loan agreement contained in the disclosure statement attached to this check.”

Notification of the loan agreement being activated by endorsement must be conspicuously printed in at least 6-point type on the back of the check in substantially the following form: “By endorsing this check, you agree to repay this loan according to the terms of the attached loan agreement.”

The check is attached to a disclosure statement that is detachable and that contains in at least 10-point boldface type a statement conspicuously placed in substantially the following form: “This is a loan solicitation. If you cash this check, you are agreeing to borrow the sum of $ _______________ at the _______________ % rate of interest for a period of _______________ months. Your monthly payments will be $ _______________ for _______________ months. If you are late with a payment, you will be charged the following fees in addition to your monthly payment: (list fees). All other terms of this loan are clearly identified as loan terms and appear on the back of the check or on this attachment. Read these terms carefully before you cash this check. Cashing this check constitutes a loan transaction. You may cancel this loan by returning the amount of the check to the lender within 10 days of the date this check is cashed. You may prepay this loan agreement at anytime without penalty. READ THE AGREEMENT BEFORE SIGNING.”

The recipient has a right to cancel the loan by refunding to the lender the amount of the check within 10 days of the date the check is cashed. The loan is deemed refunded when a refund of the amount of the check is received by the lender within 10 days of the date the check is cashed.

In the event an unsolicited check is stolen or otherwise obtained by someone other than the intended payee, and the check is cashed fraudulently or without authorization from the payee, the lender who issued the check shall provide the following recourse to the intended payee:

The lender, upon receipt of notification that intended payee did not negotiate the check, shall promptly provide the intended payee with a statement or affidavit to be signed by the intended payee confirming that the intended payee did not deposit or cash the check or receive the proceeds of the check. The lender shall also provide the intended payee with the name and telephone number of a contact person designated by the lender to provide assistance to intended payees who have been victimized by the fraudulent negotiation of unsolicited checks. The lender shall cease all collection activity against the intended payee until the lender completes an investigation into the transaction.

The intended payee shall be directed to complete and return the confirmation statement to the lender or an affiliate of the lender.

Within 30 days of the receipt of the confirmation statement, the lender shall conduct a reasonable investigation and determine whether the check was fraudulently negotiated. Absent evidence to the contrary, the presumption shall be that the confirmation statement submitted by the intended payee is accurate. The lender shall notify the intended payee in writing of the results of the investigation. If it is determined that the check was cashed fraudulently, the lender shall take immediate action to remove the intended payee from all liability on the account and to request all credit reporting agencies to remove references to the transaction, if any, from the consumer’s credit reports.

A consumer who is an intended payee of an unsolicited check under this section may bring a civil action to recover damages, costs, and attorney fees for any violation of this subsection.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a transaction in which a consumer has submitted an application or requested an extension of credit from the lender before receiving the check or instrument, or where the lender has an existing account relationship with the consumer.

A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

and is subject to all of the enforcement and penalty provisions of an unfair trade practice under this Article.

History.

2001-391, s. 1.

§§ 75-21 through 75-26.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 75-27.
Unsolicited merchandise.

Unless otherwise agreed, where unsolicited goods are delivered to a person, he has a right to refuse to accept delivery of the goods and is not bound to return such goods to the sender. If such unsolicited goods are addressed to and intended for the recipient, they shall be deemed a gift to the recipient, who may use them or dispose of them in any manner without any obligation to the sender.

History.

1969, c. 70, s. 1; 1977, c. 498.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).